Florida, session 2026, SB1514.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âNotwithstanding the repeal of section 331.326, 21 Florida Statutes, in section 10 of chapter 2022-5, Laws of 22 Florida, that section is revived, reenacted, and amended to 23 read: 24 331.326âInformation relating to trade secrets 25 confidential.âThe records of Space Florida regarding matters 26 encompassed by the Space Florida this Act are public records 27 subject to chapter 119. Any information held by Space Florida 28 which is a trade secret, as defined in s. 812.081, including 29 trade secrets of Space Florida, any spaceport user, or the space 30 industry business, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 31 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, and may not be 32 disclosed. If Space Florida determines that any information 33 requested by the public will reveal a trade secret, Space 34 Florida must it shall, in writing, inform the person making the 35 request of that determination. The determination is a final 36 order as defined in s. 120.52. Any meeting or portion of a 37 meeting of Space Floridaâs board during which the board 38 discusses information that is confidential and exempt from s. 39 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution 40 pursuant to this section is closed to the public and exempt from 41 s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution when 42 the board is discussing trade secrets. Any public record 43 generated during the closed portions of the meetings, such as 44 minutes, tape recordings, and notes, is confidential and exempt 45 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 46 Constitution. This section is subject to the Open Government 47 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 48 repealed on October 2, 2031 2021, unless reviewed and saved from 49 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 50 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 51 necessity that information held by Space Florida which is a 52 trade secret be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 53 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 54 Constitution; that any portion of a meeting of the Space Florida 55 board of directors during which the board discusses information 56 that is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 57 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution be 58 closed to the public and made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida 59 Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State Constitution; and 60 that any record generated during the closed portion of such a 61 meeting be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 62 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 63 Constitution. In order for the board to effectively and 64 efficiently perform its duties, it may be necessary to discuss 65 trade secrets. If trade secrets are not protected from 66 disclosure, participating spaceport users may hesitate, if not 67 refuse, to continue to do business with Space Florida, to the 68 economic detriment of Space Florida and Floridaâs spaceport 69 business development. Accordingly, portions of board meetings 70 during which trade secrets are discussed must be closed. Open 71 board meetings during which trade secrets are discussed subject 72 board members to penalties for violating the confidentiality of 73 trade secrets, and competitors of spaceport users who gain 74 access to such confidential trade secret information would 75 accrue a competitive economic advantage. 76 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.